Washington statutes.
RCW 7.70.010

Declaration of modification of actions for damages based upon injuries resulting from health care.

The state of Washington, exercising its police and sovereign power, hereby modifies as set forth in this chapter and in RCW 4.16.350, as now or hereafter amended, certain substantive and procedural aspects of all civil actions and causes of action, whether based on tort, contract, or otherwise, for damages for injury occurring as a result of health care which is provided after June 25, 1976.

[1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 56 s 6.]

NOTES:

Severability—1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 56: See note following RCW 4.16.350.